Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: DIVISION I PARTNERSHIPS Section 1. Section 486A.1205, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. If Except as provided in subsection 5, if a document delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing satisfies the requirements of section 486A.1201 , the secretary of state shall file it and issue any necessary certificate. Sec. 2. Section 486A.1205, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. The secretary of state may require a document to be delivered by mail or in person if the secretary of state receives credible information that the document is being submitted for filing fraudulently or may be used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 486A.1214A. House File 2678, p. 2 (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 486A.1214A Statement of removal ââ removal of information not authorized to be provided. 1. a. A person whose name, street address, mailing address, or email address has, without that personâs authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that of the registered agent or of the principal office in a partnershipâs filing may deliver to the secretary of state a notarized, sworn affidavit of unauthorized use that does all of the following: (1) Identifies the partnership registration by name and business number. (2) Indicates the affiantâs mailing address. (3) States that neither the affiant nor any agent of the affiant has authorized the filing identifying the affiant as the registered agent, providing the affiantâs street address or mailing address as an address of the registered agent or principal office, or providing the affiantâs email address as that of the registered agent. b. The affiant shall specify in the affidavit of unauthorized use the information that was not authorized to be provided. c. The secretary of state may reject an affidavit that is incomplete or that the secretary of state believes was delivered to the secretary of state with the intent to harass or defraud the partnership or the individual named as affiant. d. The office of the secretary of state shall adopt an affidavit of unauthorized use form in accordance with this section. 2. The secretary of state shall conduct an administrative review to determine whether the filing was authorized to identify the stated information as applicable. 3. If the secretary of state concludes that the filing was not authorized to provide the information identified in the affidavit, the secretary of state shall promptly file a statement of removal with respect to the identified information, and shall promptly cause the identified House File 2678, p. 3 information to cease to be listed as identified for the partnership. 4. The secretary of state shall not charge a fee for the filing of an affidavit of unauthorized use under subsection 1 or a statement of removal under subsection 3. The filing office shall not return any fee paid for filing the partnership filing identified in the affidavit. 5. Upon filing a statement of removal, the secretary of state shall send to the principal office address or registered agentâs mailing address on record for the partnership, if any, a notice stating that the statement of removal has been filed and is effective immediately. The notice shall also state that the partnership is without a registered agent or registered agent address, as applicable. 6. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 486A.1214B Interrogatories. 1. a. The secretary of state may serve one or more written interrogatories regarding any matter that pertains to a partnership and that is within the purview of the secretary of state if the secretary of state receives credible information that a partnership is being used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 486A.1214A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. 2. The secretary of state shall serve such interrogatories on the partnership that is the subject of the interrogatories by mail at the address of the registered agent that appears on the secretary of stateâs records at the time the information required by subsection 1 is received, or if the partnership has no registered agent, at the partnershipâs principal office address shown on the partnershipâs most recent filing. 3. The interrogatories must be answered by a person with House File 2678, p. 4 the authority to answer on behalf of the partnership that is the subject of the interrogatories. Each interrogatory must be answered in writing separately and in a manner that is responsive to the interrogatory. The declaration on the completed interrogatories form must be signed by a person with the authority to sign on behalf of the partnership. 4. To be considered responsive, the completed and signed interrogatories form must be received by the secretary of state by mail or in-person delivery within twenty-one calendar days after the form was mailed. 5. A response to any interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the partnership violated any provision of this chapter constitutes the partnershipâs concession to such violation. 6. A failure to respond to any interrogatory within the allotted time constitutes the partnershipâs concession that the partnership violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories. 7. If the secretary of state receives a response to each interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the partnership has not violated any provision of this chapter, the secretary of state shall take no action. 8. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. DIVISION II LIMITED PARTNERSHIPS Sec. 5. Section 488.206, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: A record authorized or required to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing under this chapter must be captioned to describe the recordâs purpose, contain the information required by this chapter but may include other information as well, and be in a medium permitted by the secretary of state. The document must be typewritten or printed. If the document is electronically transmitted, it must be in a format that can be retrieved or reproduced in typewritten or printed form. The document must be delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing. Delivery may be made by electronic transmission if and to the extent House File 2678, p. 5 permitted by the secretary of state. The secretary of state may adopt rules for the electronic filing of documents and the certification of electronically filed documents. If it is filed in typewritten or printed form and not transmitted electronically, the secretary of state may require an exact or conformed copy to be delivered with the document. Unless Except as provided in subsection 6, unless the secretary of state determines that a record does not comply with the filing requirements of this chapter , and if all filing fees have been paid, the secretary of state shall file the record and perform all of the following: Sec. 6. Section 488.206, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 6. a. The secretary of state may require a record to be delivered by mail or in person if the secretary of state receives credible information that the record is being submitted for filing fraudulently or may be used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 488.210A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 488.210A Statement of removal ââ removal of information not authorized to be provided. 1. a. A person whose name, street address, mailing address, or email address has, without that personâs authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that of the registered agent or of the principal office in a limited partnershipâs filing may deliver to the secretary of state a notarized, sworn affidavit of unauthorized use that does all of the following: (1) Identifies the limited partnership registration by name and business number. (2) Indicates the affiantâs mailing address. (3) States that neither the affiant nor any agent of the affiant has authorized the filing identifying the affiant as House File 2678, p. 6 the registered agent, providing the affiantâs street address or mailing address as an address of the registered agent or principal office, or providing the affiantâs email address as that of the registered agent. b. The affiant shall specify in the affidavit of unauthorized use the information that was not authorized to be provided. c. The secretary of state may reject an affidavit of unauthorized use that is incomplete or that the secretary of state believes was delivered to the secretary of state with the intent to harass or defraud the limited partnership or the individual named as affiant. d. The office of the secretary of state shall adopt an affidavit of unauthorized use form in accordance with this section. 2. The secretary of state shall conduct an administrative review to determine whether the filing was authorized to identify the stated information as applicable. 3. If the secretary of state concludes that the filing was not authorized to provide the information identified in the affidavit, the secretary of state shall promptly file a statement of removal with respect to the identified information, and shall promptly cause the identified information to cease to be listed as identified for the limited partnership. 4. The secretary of state shall not charge a fee for the filing of an affidavit of unauthorized use under subsection 1 or a statement of removal under subsection 3. The filing office shall not return any fee paid for filing the limited partnership filing identified in the affidavit. 5. Upon filing a statement of removal, the secretary of state shall send to the principal office address or registered agentâs mailing address on record for the limited partnership, if any, a notice stating that the statement of removal has been filed and is effective immediately. The notice shall also state that the limited partnership is without a registered agent or registered agent address, as applicable. 6. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. House File 2678, p. 7 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 488.210B Interrogatories. 1. a. The secretary of state may serve one or more written interrogatories regarding any matter that pertains to a limited partnership and that is within the purview of the secretary of state if the secretary of state receives credible information that a limited partnership is being used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 488.210A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. 2. The secretary of state shall serve such interrogatories on the limited partnership that is the subject of the interrogatories by mail at the address of the registered agent that appears on the secretary of stateâs records at the time the information required by subsection 1 is received, or if the limited partnership has no registered agent, at the limited partnershipâs principal office address shown on the limited partnershipâs most recent biennial report filed with the secretary of state. 3. The interrogatories must be answered by a person with the authority to answer on behalf of the limited partnership that is the subject of the interrogatories. Each interrogatory must be answered in writing separately and in a manner that is responsive to the interrogatory. The declaration on the completed interrogatories form must be signed by a person with the authority to sign on behalf of the limited partnership. 4. To be considered responsive, the completed and signed interrogatories form must be received by the secretary of state by mail or in-person delivery within twenty-one calendar days after the form was mailed. 5. A response to any interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the limited partnership violated any provision of this chapter constitutes the limited partnershipâs concession to such violation. House File 2678, p. 8 6. A failure to respond to any interrogatory within the allotted time constitutes the limited partnershipâs concession that the partnership violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories. 7. If the secretary of state receives a response to each interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the limited partnership has not violated any provision of any chapter, the secretary of state shall take no action. 8. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 9. Section 488.809, subsections 1, 2, and 3, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 1. The Except as provided in subsection 6, the secretary of state may dissolve a limited partnership administratively if the limited partnership does not, within sixty days after the due date, do any of the following: a. Pay any fee, tax, or penalty under this chapter or other law due the secretary of state. b. Deliver its biennial report to the secretary of state. 2. If Except as provided in subsection 6, if the secretary of state determines that a ground exists for administratively dissolving a limited partnership, the secretary of state shall file a record of the determination and serve the limited partnership with a copy of the filed record. 3. If Except as provided in subsection 6, if within sixty days after service of the copy the limited partnership does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist, the secretary of state shall administratively dissolve the limited partnership by preparing, signing, and filing a declaration of dissolution that states the grounds for dissolution. The secretary of state shall serve the limited partnership with a copy of the filed declaration. Sec. 10. Section 488.809, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 6. If the limited partnership concedes that the limited partnership has violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of interrogatories served House File 2678, p. 9 on the limited partnership pursuant to section 488.210B, the secretary of state may immediately dissolve the limited partnership administratively by preparing, signing, and filing a declaration of dissolution that states the grounds for the dissolution. The secretary of state shall serve the limited partnership with a copy of the filed declaration. DIVISION III LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES Sec. 11. Section 489.210, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. The Except as provided in subsection 7, the secretary of state shall file a record delivered to the secretary of state for filing which satisfies this chapter . The duty of the secretary of state under this section is ministerial. Sec. 12. Section 489.210, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 7. a. The secretary of state may require a record to be delivered by mail or in person if the secretary of state receives credible information that the record is being submitted for filing fraudulently or may be used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 489.212A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 489.212A Statement of removal ââ removal of information not authorized to be provided. 1. a. A person whose name, street address, mailing address, or email address has, without that personâs authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that of the registered agent or of the principal office in a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company filing may deliver to the secretary of state a notarized, sworn affidavit of unauthorized use that does all of the following: (1) Identifies the limited liability company or foreign House File 2678, p. 10 limited liability company registration by name and business number. (2) Indicates the affiantâs mailing address. (3) States that neither the affiant nor any agent of the affiant has authorized the filing identifying the affiant as the registered agent, providing the affiantâs street address or mailing address as an address of the registered agent or principal office, or providing the affiantâs email address as that of the registered agent. b. The affiant shall specify in the affidavit of unauthorized use the information that was not authorized to be provided. c. The secretary of state may reject an affidavit of unauthorized use that is incomplete or that the secretary of state believes was delivered to the secretary of state with the intent to harass or defraud the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company or the individual named as affiant. d. The office of the secretary of state shall adopt an affidavit of unauthorized use form in accordance with this section. 2. The secretary of state shall conduct an administrative review to determine whether the filing was authorized to identify the stated information as applicable. 3. If the secretary of state concludes that the filing was not authorized to provide the information identified in the affidavit, the secretary of state shall promptly file a statement of removal with respect to the identified information, and shall promptly cause the identified information to cease to be listed as identified for the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company. 4. The secretary of state shall not charge a fee for the filing of an affidavit of unauthorized use under subsection 1 or a statement of removal under subsection 3. The filing office shall not return any fee paid for filing the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company filing identified in the affidavit. 5. Upon filing a statement of removal, the secretary of state shall send to the principal office address or registered House File 2678, p. 11 agentâs mailing address on record for the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, if any, a notice stating that the statement of removal has been filed and is effective immediately. The notice shall also state that the company is without a registered agent or registered agent address, as applicable. 6. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 489.212B Interrogatories. 1. a. The secretary of state may serve one or more written interrogatories regarding any matter that pertains to a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company and that is within the purview of the secretary of state if the secretary of state receives credible information that a company is being used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 488.212A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. 2. The secretary of state shall serve such interrogatories on the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company that is the subject of the interrogatories by mail at the address of the registered agent that appears on the secretary of stateâs records at the time the information required by subsection 1 is received, or if the company has no registered agent, at the companyâs principal office address shown on the companyâs most recent biennial report filed with the secretary of state. 3. The interrogatories must be answered by a person with the authority to answer on behalf of the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company that is the subject of the interrogatories. Each interrogatory must be answered in writing separately and in a manner that is responsive to the interrogatory. The declaration on the House File 2678, p. 12 completed interrogatories form must be signed by a person with the authority to sign on behalf of the company. 4. To be considered responsive, the completed and signed interrogatories form must be received by the secretary of state by mail or in-person delivery within twenty-one calendar days after the form was mailed. 5. A response to any interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company violated any provision of this chapter constitutes the companyâs concession to such violation. 6. A failure to respond to any interrogatory within the allotted time constitutes the limited liability companyâs or foreign limited liability companyâs concession that the company violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories. 7. If the secretary of state receives a response to each interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company has not violated any provision of this chapter, the secretary of state shall take no action. 8. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 15. Section 489.708, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 6. The limited liability company or foreign limited liability company concedes that the company has violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories served on the company pursuant to section 489.212B. Sec. 16. Section 489.709, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 1. If the secretary of state determines that one or more grounds exist under section 489.708 , subsections 1 through 5, for dissolving a limited liability company, the secretary of state shall serve the company with written notice of such determination under section 489.119 . 2. If Except as specified in subsection 5, if the limited liability company does not correct each ground for dissolution House File 2678, p. 13 or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within sixty days after service of the notice under section 489.119 , the secretary of state shall administratively dissolve the company by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the company under section 489.119 . Sec. 17. Section 489.709, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. If the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company concedes that the company has violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories served on the company pursuant to section 489.212B, the secretary of state may immediately administratively dissolve the company by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the company under section 489.119. DIVISION IV BUSINESS CORPORATIONS Sec. 18. Section 490.125, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. If Except as provided in subsection 5, if a document delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing satisfies the requirements of section 490.120 , the secretary of state shall file it. Sec. 19. Section 490.125, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. The secretary of state may require a record to be delivered by mail or in person if the secretary of state receives credible information that the document is being submitted for filing fraudulently or may be used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section House File 2678, p. 14 490.1621A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. Sec. 20. Section 490.1420, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 6. The corporation concedes that the corporation has violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories served on the corporation pursuant to section 490.1621B. Sec. 21. Section 490.1421, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 1. If the secretary of state determines that one or more grounds exist under section 490.1420 , subsections 1 through 5, for dissolving a corporation, the secretary of state shall serve the corporation with written notice of such determination under section 490.504 . 2. If Except as specified in subsection 5, the corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within sixty days after service of the notice under section 490.504 , the secretary of state shall administratively dissolve the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation under section 490.504 . Sec. 22. Section 490.1421, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. If the corporation concedes that the corporation has violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subject of the interrogatories served on the corporation pursuant to section 490.1621B, the secretary of state may immediately administratively dissolve the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate House File 2678, p. 15 and serve a copy on the corporation under section 490.504. Sec. 23. NEW SECTION . 490.1621A Statement of removal ââ removal of information not authorized to be provided. 1. a. A person whose name, street address, mailing address, or email address has, without that personâs authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that of the registered agent or of the principal office in a domestic or foreign corporation filing may deliver to the secretary of state a notarized, sworn affidavit of unauthorized use that does all of the following: (1) Identifies the domestic or foreign corporation registration by name and business number. (2) Indicates the affiantâs mailing address. (3) States that neither the affiant nor any agent of the affiant has authorized the filing identifying the affiant as the registered agent, providing the affiantâs street address or mailing address as an address of the registered agent or principal office, or providing the affiantâs email address as that of the registered agent. b. The affiant shall specify in the affidavit of unauthorized use the information that was not authorized to be provided. c. The secretary of state may reject an affidavit of unauthorized use that is incomplete or that the secretary of state believes was delivered to the secretary of state with the intent to harass or defraud the domestic or foreign corporation or the individual named as affiant. d. The office of the secretary of state shall adopt an affidavit of unauthorized use form in accordance with this section. 2. The secretary of state shall conduct an administrative review to determine whether the filing was authorized to identify the stated information as applicable. 3. If the secretary of state concludes that the filing was not authorized to provide the information identified in the affidavit, the secretary of state shall promptly file a statement of removal with respect to the identified information, and shall promptly cause the identified information to cease to be listed as identified for the House File 2678, p. 16 domestic or foreign corporation. 4. The secretary of state shall not charge a fee for the filing of an affidavit of unauthorized use under subsection 1 or a statement of removal under subsection 3. The filing office shall not return any fee paid for filing the domestic or foreign corporation filing identified in the affidavit. 5. Upon filing a statement of removal, the secretary of state shall send to the principal office address or registered agentâs mailing address on record for the domestic or foreign corporation, if any, a notice stating that the statement of removal has been filed and is effective immediately. The notice shall also state that the corporation is without a registered agent or registered agent address, as applicable. 6. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 24. NEW SECTION . 490.1621B Interrogatories. 1. a. The secretary of state may serve one or more written interrogatories regarding any matter that pertains to a domestic or foreign corporation and that is within the purview of the secretary of state if the secretary of state receives credible information that a corporation is being used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 490.1621A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. 2. The secretary of state shall serve such interrogatories on the domestic or foreign corporation that is the subject of the interrogatories by mail at the address of the registered agent that appears on the secretary of stateâs records at the time the information required by subsection 1 is received, or if the corporation has no registered agent, at the corporationâs principal office address shown on the corporationâs most recent biennial report filed with the secretary of state. House File 2678, p. 17 3. The interrogatories must be answered by a person with the authority to answer on behalf of the domestic or foreign corporation that is the subject of the interrogatories. Each interrogatory must be answered in writing separately and in a manner that is responsive to the interrogatory. The declaration on the completed interrogatories form must be signed by a person with the authority to sign on behalf of the corporation. 4. To be considered responsive, the completed and signed interrogatories form must be received by the secretary of state by mail or in-person delivery within twenty-one calendar days after the form was mailed. 5. A response to any interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the domestic or foreign corporation violated any provision of this chapter constitutes the corporationâs concession to such violation. 6. A failure to respond to any interrogatory within the allotted time constitutes the domestic or foreign corporationâs concession that the corporation violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories. 7. If the secretary of state receives a response to each interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the domestic or foreign corporation has not violated any provision of this chapter, the secretary of state shall take no action. 8. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. DIVISION V TRADITIONAL COOPERATIVE ASSOCIATIONS Sec. 25. Section 499.44, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. The Except as provided in subsection 6, the secretary of state shall record all documents submitted to and required to be filed with the secretary of state under this chapter . Sec. 26. Section 499.44, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 6. a. The secretary of state may require a document to be delivered by mail or in person if the secretary of state receives credible information that the document is House File 2678, p. 18 being submitted for filing fraudulently or may be used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 499.50. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. Sec. 27. NEW SECTION . 499.50 Statement of removal ââ removal of information not authorized to be provided. 1. a. A person whose name, street address, mailing address, or email address has, without that personâs authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that of the registered agent or of the principal office in an association filing may deliver to the secretary of state a notarized, sworn affidavit of unauthorized use that does all of the following: (1) Identifies the association registration by name and business number. (2) Indicates the affiantâs mailing address. (3) States that neither the affiant nor any agent of the affiant has authorized the filing identifying the affiant as the registered agent, providing the affiantâs street address or mailing address as an address of the registered agent or principal office, or providing the affiantâs email address as that of the registered agent. b. The affiant shall specify in the affidavit the information of unauthorized use that was not authorized to be provided. c. The secretary of state may reject an affidavit of unauthorized use that is incomplete or that the secretary of state believes was delivered to the secretary of state with the intent to harass or defraud the association or the individual named as affiant. d. The office of the secretary of state shall adopt an affidavit of unauthorized use form in accordance with this section. 2. The secretary of state shall conduct an administrative House File 2678, p. 19 review to determine whether the filing was authorized to identify the stated information as applicable. 3. If the secretary of state concludes that the filing was not authorized to provide the information identified in the affidavit, the secretary of state shall promptly file a statement of removal with respect to the identified information, and shall promptly cause the identified information to cease to be listed as identified for the association. 4. The secretary of state shall not charge a fee for the filing of an affidavit of unauthorized use under subsection 1 or a statement of removal under subsection 3. The filing office shall not return any fee paid for filing the association filing identified in the affidavit. 5. Upon filing a statement of removal, the secretary of state shall send to the principal office address or registered agentâs mailing address on record for the association, if any, a notice stating that the statement of removal has been filed and is effective immediately. The notice shall also state that the association is without a registered agent or registered agent address, as applicable. 6. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 28. NEW SECTION . 499.51 Interrogatories. 1. a. The secretary of state may serve one or more written interrogatories regarding any matter that pertains to an association and that is within the purview of the secretary of state if the secretary of state receives credible information that an association is being used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 499.50. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. 2. The secretary of state shall serve such interrogatories House File 2678, p. 20 on the association that is the subject of the interrogatories by mail at the address of the registered agent that appears on the secretary of stateâs records at the time the information required by subsection 1 is received, or if the association has no registered agent, at the associationâs principal office address shown on the associationâs most recent biennial report filed with the secretary of state. 3. The interrogatories must be answered by a person with the authority to answer on behalf of the association that is the subject of the interrogatories. Each interrogatory must be answered in writing separately and in a manner that is responsive to the interrogatory. The declaration on the completed interrogatories form must be signed by a person with the authority to sign on behalf of the association. 4. To be considered responsive, the completed and signed interrogatories form must be received by the secretary of state by mail or in-person delivery within twenty-one calendar days after the form was mailed. 5. A response to any interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the association violated any provision of this chapter constitutes the associationâs concession to such violation. 6. A failure to respond to any interrogatory within the allotted time constitutes the associationâs concession that the association violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories. 7. If the secretary of state receives a response to each interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the association has not violated any provision of this chapter, the secretary of state shall take no action. 8. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 29. Section 499.76, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. The association concedes that the association has violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories served on the association pursuant to section 599.51. Sec. 30. Section 499.77, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are House File 2678, p. 21 amended to read as follows: 1. If the secretary of state determines that one or more grounds exist under section 499.76 , subsections 1 through 4, for dissolving an association, the secretary of state shall serve the association by ordinary mail with written notice of the secretary of stateâs determination pursuant to section 499.75 . 2. If Except as specified in subsection 5, if the association does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within sixty days after service of the notice is perfected pursuant to section 499.75 , the secretary of state shall administratively dissolve the association by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the association pursuant to section 499.75 . Sec. 31. Section 499.77, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. If the association concedes that it has violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories served on the association pursuant to section 499.51, the secretary of state may immediately administratively dissolve the association by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the association under section 499.75. DIVISION VI MULTIPLE HOUSING COOPERATIVES Sec. 32. Section 499A.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. The secretary of state may require a document to be delivered by mail or in person if the secretary of state receives credible information that the document is being submitted for filing fraudulently or may be used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means House File 2678, p. 22 any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use. The secretary of state shall accept and review an affidavit of unauthorized use completed and submitted to the secretary of state under this section in the same manner as the secretary of state accepts and reviews a submitted affidavit of unauthorized use under section 499.50. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. DIVISION VII CLOSE COOPERATIVES Sec. 33. Section 501.105, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 7. a. The secretary of state may require a document to be delivered by mail or in person if the secretary of state receives credible information that the document is being submitted for filing fraudulently or may be used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 501.713A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. Sec. 34. NEW SECTION . 501.713A Statement of removal ââ removal of information not authorized to be provided. 1. a. A person whose name, street address, mailing address, or email address has, without that personâs authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that of the registered agent or of the principal office in a cooperative filing may deliver to the secretary of state a notarized, sworn affidavit of unauthorized use that does all of the following: (1) Identifies the cooperative registration by name and business number. (2) Indicates the affiantâs mailing address. House File 2678, p. 23 (3) States that neither the affiant nor any agent of the affiant has authorized the filing identifying the affiant as the registered agent, providing the affiantâs street address or mailing address as an address of the registered agent or principal office, or providing the affiantâs email address as that of the registered agent. b. The affiant shall specify in the affidavit of unauthorized use the information that was not authorized to be provided. c. The secretary of state may reject an affidavit of unauthorized use that is incomplete or that the secretary of state believes was delivered to the secretary of state with the intent to harass or defraud the cooperative or the individual named as affiant. d. The office of the secretary of state shall adopt an affidavit of unauthorized use form in accordance with this section. 2. The secretary of state shall conduct an administrative review to determine whether the filing was authorized to identify the stated information as applicable. 3. If the secretary of state concludes that the filing was not authorized to provide the information identified in the affidavit, the secretary of state shall promptly file a statement of removal with respect to the identified information, and shall promptly cause the identified information to cease to be listed as identified for the cooperative. 4. The secretary of state shall not charge a fee for the filing of an affidavit of unauthorized use under subsection 1 or a statement of removal under subsection 3. The filing office shall not return any fee paid for filing the cooperative filing identified in the affidavit. 5. Upon filing a statement of removal, the secretary of state shall send to the principal office address or registered agentâs mailing address on record for the cooperative, if any, a notice stating that the statement of removal has been filed and is effective immediately. The notice shall also state that the cooperative is without a registered agent or registered agent address, as applicable. House File 2678, p. 24 6. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 35. NEW SECTION . 501.713B Interrogatories. 1. a. The secretary of state may serve one or more written interrogatories regarding any matter that pertains to a cooperative and that is within the purview of the secretary of state if the secretary of state receives credible information that a cooperative is being used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 501.713A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. 2. The secretary of state shall serve such interrogatories on the cooperative that is the subject of the interrogatories by mail at the address of the registered agent that appears on the secretary of stateâs records at the time the information required by subsection 1 is received, or if the cooperative has no registered agent, at the cooperativeâs principal office address shown on the cooperativeâs most recent biennial report filed with the secretary of state. 3. The interrogatories must be answered by a person with the authority to answer on behalf of the cooperative that is the subject of the interrogatories. Each interrogatory must be answered in writing separately and in a manner that is responsive to the interrogatory. The declaration on the completed interrogatories form must be signed by a person with the authority to sign on behalf of the cooperative. 4. To be considered responsive, the completed and signed interrogatories form must be received by the secretary of state by mail or in-person delivery within twenty-one calendar days after the form was mailed. 5. A response to any interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the cooperative violated any provision of this chapter constitutes the cooperative concession to such House File 2678, p. 25 violation. 6. A failure to respond to any interrogatory within the allotted time constitutes the cooperativeâs concession that the cooperative violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories. 7. If the secretary of state receives a response to each interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the cooperative has not violated any provision of this chapter, the secretary shall take no action. 8. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 36. Section 501.811, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. The cooperative concedes that the cooperative has violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories served on the cooperative pursuant to section 501.713B. Sec. 37. Section 501.812, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 1. If the secretary of state determines that one or more grounds exist under section 501.811 , subsections 1 through 4, for dissolving a cooperative, the secretary of state shall serve the cooperative with written notice of the secretary of stateâs determination under section 501.106 . 2. If Except as provided in subsection 6, if the cooperative does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within sixty days after service of the notice is perfected under section 501.106 , the secretary of state shall administratively dissolve the cooperative by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the cooperative under section 501.106 . Sec. 38. Section 501.812, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 6. If the cooperative concedes that the cooperative has violated a provision or provisions of this House File 2678, p. 26 chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories served on the cooperative pursuant to section 501.713B, the secretary of state may immediately administratively dissolve the cooperative by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the cooperative under section 501.106. DIVISION VIII 501A CLOSE COOPERATIVES Sec. 39. Section 501A.202, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. If Except as provided in subsection 5, if a document delivered to the secretary of state for filing satisfies the requirements of section 501A.201 , the secretary of state shall file it and issue any necessary certificate. Sec. 40. Section 501A.202, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. The secretary of state may require a document to be delivered by mail or in person if the secretary of state receives credible information that the document is being submitted for filing fraudulently or may be used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 501A.231A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. Sec. 41. NEW SECTION . 501A.231A Statement of removal ââ removal of information not authorized to be provided. 1. a. A person whose name, street address, mailing address, or email address has, without that personâs authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that of the registered agent or of the principal office in a cooperative filing may deliver to the secretary of state a notarized, sworn affidavit of unauthorized use that does all of the following: (1) Identifies the cooperative registration by name and House File 2678, p. 27 business number. (2) Indicates the affiantâs mailing address. (3) States that neither the affiant nor any agent of the affiant has authorized the filing identifying the affiant as the registered agent, providing the affiantâs street address or mailing address as an address of the registered agent or principal office, or providing the affiantâs email address as that of the registered agent. b. The affiant shall specify in the affidavit of unauthorized use the information that was not authorized to be provided. c. The secretary of state may reject an affidavit of unauthorized use that is incomplete or that the secretary of state believes was delivered to the secretary of state with the intent to harass or defraud the cooperative or the individual named as affiant. d. The office of the secretary of state shall adopt an affidavit of unauthorized use form in accordance with this section. 2. The secretary of state shall conduct an administrative review to determine whether the filing was authorized to identify the stated information as applicable. 3. If the secretary of state concludes that the filing was not authorized to provide the information identified in the affidavit, the secretary of state shall promptly file a statement of removal with respect to the identified information, and shall promptly cause the identified information to cease to be listed as identified for the cooperative. 4. The secretary of state shall not charge a fee for the filing of an affidavit of unauthorized use under subsection 1 or a statement of removal under subsection 3. The filing office shall not return any fee paid for filing the cooperative filing identified in the affidavit. 5. Upon filing a statement of removal, the secretary of state shall send to the principal office address or registered agentâs mailing address on record for the cooperative, if any, a notice stating that the statement of removal has been filed and is effective immediately. The notice shall also state that House File 2678, p. 28 the cooperative is without a registered agent or registered agent address, as applicable. 6. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 42. NEW SECTION . 501A.231B Interrogatories. 1. a. The secretary of state may serve one or more written interrogatories regarding any matter that pertains to a cooperative and that is within the purview of the secretary of state if the secretary of state receives credible information that a cooperative is being used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 501A.231A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. 2. The secretary of state shall serve such interrogatories on the cooperative that is the subject of the interrogatories by mail at the address of the registered agent that appears on the secretary of stateâs records at the time the information required by subsection 1 is received, or if the cooperative has no registered agent, at the cooperativeâs principal office address shown on the cooperativeâs most recent biennial report filed with the secretary of state. 3. The interrogatories must be answered by a person with the authority to answer on behalf of the cooperative that is the subject of the interrogatories. Each interrogatory must be answered in writing separately and in a manner that is responsive to the interrogatory. The declaration on the completed interrogatories form must be signed by a person with the authority to sign on behalf of the cooperative. 4. To be considered responsive, the completed and signed interrogatories form must be received by the secretary of state by mail or in-person delivery within twenty-one calendar days after the form was mailed. 5. A response to any interrogatory that indicates to the House File 2678, p. 29 secretary of state that the cooperative violated any provision of this chapter constitutes the cooperative concession to such violation. 6. A failure to respond to any interrogatory within the allotted time constitutes the cooperativeâs concession that the cooperative violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories. 7. If the secretary of state receives a response to each interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the cooperative has not violated any provision of this chapter, the secretary of state shall take no action. 8. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. DIVISION IX NONPROFIT CORPORATIONS Sec. 43. Section 504.116, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. If Except as provided in subsection 5, if a document delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing satisfies the requirements of section 504.111 , the secretary of state shall file it. Sec. 44. Section 504.116, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. The secretary of state may require a document to be delivered by mail or in person if the secretary of state receives credible information that the document is being submitted for filing fraudulently or may be used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 504.1621A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. Sec. 45. Section 504.1421, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. The corporation concedes that the House File 2678, p. 30 corporation has violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories served on the corporation pursuant to section 504.1621B. Sec. 46. Section 504.1422, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 1. Upon determining that one or more grounds exist under section 504.1421 , subsections 1 through 4, for dissolving a corporation, the secretary of state shall serve the corporation with written notice of that determination under section 504.504 . 2. If Except as specified in subsection 6, the corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within at least sixty days after service of notice is perfected under section 504.504 , the secretary of state may administratively dissolve the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate of dissolution and serve a copy on the corporation under section 504.504 . Sec. 47. Section 504.1422, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 6. If the corporation concedes that the corporation has violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories served on the corporation pursuant to section 504.1621B, the secretary of state may immediately administratively dissolve the corporation by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation under section 504.504. Sec. 48. NEW SECTION . 504.1621A Statement of removal ââ removal of information not authorized to be provided. 1. a. A person whose name, street address, mailing address, or email address has, without that personâs authorization, been provided to the secretary of state as that of the registered agent or of the principal office in a domestic or foreign corporation filing may deliver to the secretary of state a House File 2678, p. 31 notarized, sworn affidavit of unauthorized use that does all of the following: (1) Identifies the domestic or foreign corporation registration by name and business number. (2) Indicates the affiantâs mailing address. (3) States that neither the affiant nor any agent of the affiant has authorized the filing identifying the affiant as the registered agent, providing the affiantâs street address or mailing address as an address of the registered agent or principal office, or providing the affiantâs email address as that of the registered agent. b. The affiant shall specify in the affidavit of unauthorized use the information that was not authorized to be provided. c. The secretary of state may reject an affidavit of unauthorized use that is incomplete or that the secretary of state believes was delivered to the secretary of state with the intent to harass or defraud the domestic or foreign corporation or the individual named as affiant. d. The office of the secretary of state shall adopt an affidavit of unauthorized use form in accordance with this section. 2. The secretary of state shall conduct an administrative review to determine whether the filing was authorized to identify the stated information as applicable. 3. If the secretary of state concludes that the filing was not authorized to provide the information identified in the affidavit, the secretary of state shall promptly file a statement of removal with respect to the identified information, and shall promptly cause the identified information to cease to be listed as identified for the domestic or foreign corporation. 4. The secretary of state shall not charge a fee for the filing of an affidavit of unauthorized use under subsection 1 or a statement of removal under subsection 3. The filing office shall not return any fee paid for filing the domestic or foreign corporation filing identified in the affidavit. 5. Upon filing a statement of removal, the secretary of state shall send to the principal office address or registered House File 2678, p. 32 agentâs mailing address on record for the domestic or foreign corporation, if any, a notice stating that the statement of removal has been filed and is effective immediately. The notice shall also state that the corporation is without a registered agent or registered agent address, as applicable. 6. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 49. NEW SECTION . 504.1621B Interrogatories. 1. a. The secretary of state may serve one or more written interrogatories regarding any matter that pertains to a domestic or foreign corporation and that is within the purview of the secretary of state if the secretary of state receives credible information that a corporation is being used to accomplish a fraudulent, criminal, or unlawful purpose. b. As used in paragraph âaâ , âcredible informationâ means any of the following: (1) An affidavit of unauthorized use as provided in section 504.1621A. (2) Information provided to the secretary of state by another government agency. (3) Information collected by the secretary of state from a credible third-party data set. 2. The secretary of state shall serve such interrogatories on the domestic or foreign corporation that is the subject of the interrogatories by mail at the address of the registered agent that appears on the secretary of stateâs records at the time the information required by subsection 1 is received, or if the corporation has no registered agent, at the corporationâs principal office address shown on the corporationâs most recent biennial report filed with the secretary of state. 3. The interrogatories must be answered by a person with the authority to answer on behalf of the domestic or foreign corporation that is the subject of the interrogatories. Each interrogatory must be answered in writing separately and in a manner that is responsive to the interrogatories. The declaration on the completed interrogatories form must be signed by a person with the authority to sign on behalf of the corporation. House File 2678, p. 33 4. To be considered responsive, the completed and signed interrogatories form must be received by the secretary of state by mail or in-person delivery within twenty-one calendar days after the form was mailed. 5. A response to any interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the domestic or foreign corporation violated any provision of this chapter constitutes the corporationâs concession to such violation. 6. A failure to respond to any interrogatory within the allotted time constitutes the domestic or foreign corporationâs concession that the corporation violated a provision or provisions of this chapter that are the subjects of the interrogatories. 7. If the secretary of state receives a response to each interrogatory that indicates to the secretary of state that the domestic or foreign corporation has not violated any provision of this chapter, the secretary of state shall take no action. 8. The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A necessary or desirable to administer this section. Sec. 50. DIRECTIONS TO CODE EDITOR. The Code editor shall organize sections 504.1621 through 504.1630 as a new part of chapter 504, subchapter XVI. DIVISION X LANDHOLDINGS Sec. 51. Section 9I.7, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: A nonresident alien, foreign business, or foreign government, or an agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof, which owns an interest in agricultural land within this state on or after January 1, 1980, shall register the agricultural land with the secretary of state. The registration shall be made within sixty days after January 1, 1980, or within sixty days after acquiring the land or the interest in land, whichever is later. The registration shall be made online or in the form and manner prescribed by the secretary of state. Information described in this section is a confidential record and subject to use in the same manner as provided in section 10B.5. As part of the registration, the nonresident alien, foreign business, or foreign government, or an agent, trustee, or fiduciary House File 2678, p. 34 thereof, shall file all of the following information: Sec. 52. Section 10B.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsections: NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. a. âBusiness entityâ means a person, formed under the statutes of this state or another jurisdiction for purposes of engaging in a commercial activity on a profit, cooperative, or not-for-profit basis, including but not limited to a corporation or entity taxed as a corporation under the Internal Revenue Code, nonprofit corporation, cooperative or cooperative association, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, investment company, joint stock company, joint stock association, or trust, including but not limited to a business trust. b. âBusiness entityâ does not include a family farm corporation, family farm limited liability company, family trust, revocable trust, testamentary trust, or family farm unincorporated nonprofit association, each as defined in section 9H.1. NEW SUBSECTION . 10A. âOut-of-state business entityâ means a business entity formed under the statutes of any of the following: a. A state of the United States, other than Iowa. b. A territory of the United States. NEW SUBSECTION . 10B. âOut-of-state individualâ means an individual who is domiciled in any of the following: a. A state of the United States, other than Iowa. b. A territory of the United States. Sec. 53. Section 10B.1, subsection 11, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . 0f. An out-of-state business entity holding an interest in agricultural land in this state, including a general partnership in which a partner is domiciled in another state, or territory, of the United States. NEW PARAGRAPH . 00f. An out-of-state individual holding an interest in agricultural land in this state. Sec. 54. Section 10B.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. A person not described in this section House File 2678, p. 35 who is an authorized representative of an out-of-state business entity or an out-of-state individual. Sec. 55. Section 10B.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . 0b. If the reporting entity is a general partnership, the name of and address of each partner who resides in another state, or territory, of the United States. Sec. 56. Section 10B.5, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2. a. Information Except as provided in reports paragraph âbâ and section 10B.5A, a report required in to be filed under this chapter is a confidential record as provided in section 22.7 . The attorney general may have access to the reports, and may use information in the reports in any action to enforce state law, including but not limited to chapters 9H and 9I . The reports shall be made available to members of the general assembly and appropriate committees of the general assembly in order to determine the extent that agricultural land is held in this state by corporations and other business and foreign entities and the effect of such land ownership upon the economy of this state. The secretary of state shall assist any committee of the general assembly studying these issues. b. A report filed under this chapter is not a confidential record if the reporting entity is any of the following: (1) A foreign business, foreign government, or nonresident alien. (2) An out-of-state business entity or an out-of-state individual. Sec. 57. Section 10B.5A, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10B.5A Annual summary to governor and general assembly. 1. The secretary of state shall prepare an annual summary of foreign and out-of-state agricultural landholding. 2. a. The summary must be include a report summarizing the compiled information for agricultural landholdings by foreign businesses, foreign governments, and nonresident aliens included in the current registrations filed pursuant to section 9I.7 and the last reports filed pursuant to section 10B.4 . b. The summary must include a report summarizing the House File 2678, p. 36 compiled information for agricultural landholding by out-of-state business entities and out-of-state individuals included in the last reports filed pursuant to section 10B.4. 3. The information described in subsection 2, is not a confidential record as provided in section 22.7 . The attorney general may have access to the annual summary and may use information in the annual summary in any action to enforce state law, including but not limited to chapters 9H and 9I , and this chapter . The annual summary shall be made available to the governor, members of the general assembly, and appropriate committees of the general assembly in order to determine the extent that agricultural land is held in this state by foreign entities and the effect of such land ownership upon the economy of this state. Upon request, the secretary of state shall assist any committee of the general assembly studying these issues. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2678, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor